Illinois, session 104th, HB5131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 370b.2 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370b.2 new)7    Sec. 370b.2. Health insurance issuer claim discrimination.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Discriminate" has the meaning described in 42 U.S.C. 10300gg-5 and any applicable regulations.11    "Health care professional" has the meaning given to that 12term in Section 2105-15.7 of the Department of Professional 13Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.14    (b) A health insurance issuer that delivers, issues for 15delivery, or renews in this State a health insurance policy 16shall not discriminate with respect to participation under the 17health insurance policy against a health care professional who 18is acting within the scope of the health care professional's 19license or certification under applicable State law.20    (c) This Section does not require that a health insurance 21issuer described in subsection (b) contract with any health 22care professional willing to abide by the terms and conditions 23for participation established by the health insurance issuer.  HB5131- 2 -LRB104 19984 BAB 33435 b1    (d) This Section does not prohibit a health insurance 2issuer described in subsection (b) from establishing varying 3reimbursement rates based on quality or performance measures.